Hawaii statutes.
§467B-2.1 Registration of charitable
organizations. (a) Every public benefit corporation domiciled in Hawaii
and every charitable organization not exempted by section 467B‑11.5 shall
register with the department prior to conducting any solicitation of contributions
or prior to having any solicitation of contributions conducted on its behalf by
others. Two authorized officers of the charitable organization shall sign the
registration form and shall certify that the statements therein are true and
correct to the best of their knowledge subject to penalties imposed by section
710-1063. A central or parent organization that has received a group exemption
letter from the Internal Revenue Service may submit a consolidated application
for registration for itself and any or all of the subordinate organizations
covered under the group exemption that are included in the central or parent
organization's annual information return to the Internal Revenue Service.

(b) The attorney general may make available a
registration form to assist in the registration by charitable organizations.

(c) The attorney general may require that
registration forms be filed with the department electronically and may require
the use of electronic signatures. [L 2008, c 174, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 61, §2;
am L 2016, c 163, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next